Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.10, subdivision 2e, is amended to read: Subd. 2e. Local optional revenue. (a) Local optional revenue for a school district equals the sum of the district's first tier local optional revenue and second tier local optional revenue. new text begin For fiscal year 2025 and 2026, new text end a district's first tier local optional revenue equals $300 times the adjusted pupil units of the district for that school year. new text begin For fiscal year 2027 and later, a district's first tier local optional revenue equals $400 times the adjusted pupil units of the district for that school year. new text end A district's second tier local optional revenue equals $424 times the adjusted pupil units of the district for that school year. (b) A district's local optional levy equals the sum of the first tier local optional levy and the second tier local optional levy. (c) A district's first tier local optional levy equals the district's first tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $880,000. (d) deleted text begin For fiscal year 2023, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $548,842. For fiscal year 2024, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $510,000.deleted text end For fiscal year 2025, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $626,450. For fiscal year 2026, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $642,038. For fiscal year 2027 and later, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $671,345. (e) The local optional levy must be spread on referendum market value. A district may levy less than the permitted amount. (f) A district's local optional aid equals its local optional revenue minus its local optional levy. If a district's actual levy for first or second tier local optional revenue is less than its maximum levy limit for that tier, its aid must be proportionately reduced. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.17, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Referendum allowance. (a) A district's initial referendum allowance for fiscal year deleted text begin 2021deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end and later equals the result of the following calculations: deleted text begin (1) subtract $424 from the district's allowance under Minnesota Statutes 2018, section 126C.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (5); deleted text end deleted text begin (2) if the result of clause (1) is less than zero, set the allowance to zero; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) add to the result in clause (2) any new referendum allowance authorized between July 1, 2013, and December 31, 2013, under Minnesota Statutes 2013, section 126C.17, subdivision 9a; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) add to the result in clause (3) any additional referendum allowance per adjusted pupil unit authorized between January 1, 2014, and June 30, 2019; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) subtract from the result in clause (4) any allowances expiring in fiscal year 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, or 2020; deleted text end deleted text begin (6) subtract $300 from the result in clause (5); and deleted text end deleted text begin (7) if the result of clause (6) is less than zero, set the allowance to zero. deleted text end new text begin (1) subtract $100 from the district's allowance for fiscal year 2026 calculated under Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (7); and new text end new text begin (2) if the result of clause (1) is less than zero, set the allowance to zero. new text end (b) A district's referendum allowance equals the sum of the district's initial referendum allowance, plus any new referendum allowance authorized after July 1, deleted text begin 2019deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end , minus any allowances expiring in fiscal year deleted text begin 2021deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end or later, plus any inflation adjustments for fiscal year deleted text begin 2021deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end and later approved by the voters prior to July 1, deleted text begin 2019deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end , provided that the allowance may not be less than zero. For a district with more than one allowance for fiscal year deleted text begin 2015 that expires in the same yeardeleted text end new text begin 2027new text end , the reduction under paragraph (a), deleted text begin clausesdeleted text end new text begin clausenew text end (1) deleted text begin and (6)deleted text end , shall be made first from any allowances that do not have an inflation adjustment approved by the voters. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin General education aid. new text end new text begin (a) For general education aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.13, subdivision 4: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The 2026 appropriation includes $....... for 2025 and $....... for 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The 2027 appropriation includes $....... for 2026 and $....... for 2027. new text end